Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 2 Evaluating Facilities for Examination of Persons
Ordered to Undergo Evaluation
for Mental Illness

37-7-60.
Designation of evaluating facilities.

Any state owned or state operated facility may be designated by the department as an evaluating facility. The department shall maintain an evaluating facility at each Georgia regional hospital which shall accept, under Code Sections 37-7-61 through 37-7-65,
patients found in any county in the service region of the hospital designated by the department. Any other facility within the State of Georgia may be so designated by the department at the request of or with the consent of the governing
officers of the facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.11, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-405.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

37-7-61.
Petition for court ordered evaluation.

Proceedings for a court ordered evaluation may be initiated in the following manner:

Any person may file an application executed under oath with the community mental health center for a court ordered evaluation of a person located within that county who is alleged by such application to be an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or
a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment. Upon the filing of such application, the community mental health center shall make a preliminary investigation and, if the investigation shows that there is probable cause to believe
that such allegation is true, it shall file a petition with the court in the county where the patient is located seeking an involuntary admission for evaluation; and

Any person may file with the court a petition executed under oath alleging that a person within the county is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment. The petition must be accompanied by the certificate
of a physician or psychologist stating that he has examined the patient within the preceding five days and has found that the patient may be an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment
and that a full evaluation of the patient is necessary.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.12, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-405.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 31; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.8.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-7-62.
Hearing on petition for court ordered evaluation; notice; appointment of representatives; patient’s right to counsel; waiver of hearing by patient; procedure upon issuance of order for evaluation.

The court shall review the petition filed under Code Section 37-7-61 and if the court finds reasonable cause to believe that the patient may be an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment, the court shall
hold a full and fair hearing on the petition no sooner than ten days and no later than 15 days after such petition is filed. Within five days after the filing of such petition, the court shall serve notice of the hearing upon the
patient and his representatives and upon the petitioner. Representatives for the patient shall be appointed pursuant to Code Section 37-7-147, provided that the court shall designate the second representative or, in the absence
of designation of one representative by the patient, both representatives; and, in the absence of such representatives or if the department is the guardian, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem who is not the department.
The notice required by this Code section shall include the time and place of the hearing; notice of the patient’s right to counsel, that the patient or his representatives may apply for court appointed counsel if the patient cannot
afford counsel, and that the court will appoint counsel unless the patient indicates in writing that he does not wish to be represented by counsel; and notice that the patient may waive his rights to a hearing under this Code section.
A copy of the petition filed under Code Section 37-7-61 shall be attached to the notice. The patient shall have a right to counsel. If the patient is unable to afford counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for the patient unless
the patient indicates in writing that he does not desire to be represented by counsel. The hearing may be waived by the patient after appointment or waiver of counsel.

After a full and fair hearing or, if the hearing is waived, after a full review of the evidence, if the court is satisfied that immediate evaluation is necessary, the court shall issue an order to any peace officer to deliver the patient forthwith to
the evaluating facility designated by the department to admit persons ordered by that court to be evaluated.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.13, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-405.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

Cross references.

Guardians of incapacitated adults, T. 29, C. 5.

37-7-63.
Admission of persons to evaluating facilities for evaluation and emergency treatment.

Any person who is brought to an evaluating facility under Code Section 37-7-43 or under a court order as provided in Code Section 37-7-62 shall be received for evaluation and such treatment as is indicated by good medical practice.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.14, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-405.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37.

37-7-64.
Length of period of detention in evaluating facility; discharge; procedure upon determination of need for hospitalization or involuntary treatment; notice of discharge from evaluating facility.

A patient who has been admitted to an evaluating facility pursuant to Code Section 37-7-43, 37-7-63, or subparagraph (a)(3)(B) of Code Section 37-7-81.1 may be detained for a period not to exceed five days, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excluded. The
patient shall be discharged upon a finding that the patient is not an alcoholic, a drug dependent person, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment or upon a finding and certification that the patient meets all of the outpatient
treatment requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-7-90, in which event a patient meeting those outpatient treatment requirements shall be discharged under the conditions provided in Code
Section 37-7-91 but, in any event, upon the expiration of the five-day evaluation period unless:

Within that period:

The patient is admitted as a voluntary patient under Code Section 37-7-20; or

The patient is admitted for involuntary inpatient treatment under Code Section 37-7-81; or

The patient is under criminal charges, notice of which has been given in writing to the facility, in which case the provisions of Code Section 37-7-95 shall apply.

If hospitalization appears desirable, the staff physicians or psychologists of the evaluating facility shall encourage the patient to apply for voluntary hospitalization unless the attending physician or treating psychologist finds that the patient is
unable to understand the nature of voluntary hospitalization, that voluntary hospitalization would be harmful to the patient, or that the patient is determined to be an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser in
need of involuntary treatment, which finding shall be entered in the patient’s record.

If, after evaluation of the patient, it is determined by the chief medical officer that proceedings for involuntary treatment of the patient should be initiated pursuant to Code Section 37-7-81 or pursuant to Part 4 of this article, the chief medical
officer shall direct that an individualized treatment plan be developed for that patient during the five-day period that he is detained for evaluation in the facility.

Notice of the discharge shall be given to the patient and his representatives; to the person who filed the petition; if the patient was admitted to the evaluating facility from an emergency receiving facility under Code Section 37-7-43, to the physician
or psychologist who executed the certificate or to the court which issued the order pursuant to Code Section 37-7-41; if the patient was under criminal charges of which the facility received written notification, by certified mail
or statutory overnight delivery to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient; and, if the patient was admitted to the evaluating facility under Code Section 37-7-62, to the court that ordered the evaluation.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-404.15, 88-404.16, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1293, § 6; Code 1933, §§ 88-405.5, 88-405.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, §
37; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 32; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

37-7-65.
Request for transfer to another evaluating facility; direction of notice of transfer.

Any patient admitted to an evaluating facility may apply to the chief medical officer of that facility for transfer at his own expense to any other approved evaluating facility. If the evaluating facility to which transfer is requested agrees to admit
the patient and if the patient is able to pay for evaluation at such facility, he shall be transferred forthwith. In such case, Code Section 37-7-64 shall apply; and the time periods specified shall be counted from the date of admission
to the evaluating facility to which the patient is transferred. Notice of the transfer shall be given to the patient’s representatives; to the person who filed the original petition, if any; if the patient was admitted to the evaluating
facility from an emergency receiving facility under Code Section 37-7-43, to the physician or psychologist who executed the certificate or to the court which issued the order pursuant to Code Section 37-7-41; if the patient was under
criminal charges of which the facility received written notification, by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient; and, if the patient was admitted to the
evaluating facility under Code Section 37-7-62, to the court that ordered the evaluation.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.17, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-405.7, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 19; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.